Missouri, session 2026, SB1623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 428.049, 456.031, 456.1-103, 456.4-
2
419, 456.5-505, and 456.8-808, RSMo, are repealed and six new
3
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
4
428.049, 456.031, 456.1-103, 456.4-419, 456.5-505, and 456.8-
5
808, to read as follows:
1
428.049. A claim for relief or cause of action with
2
respect to a f raudulent transfer or obligation under
3
sections 428.005 to 428.059 is extinguished unless action is
4
brought:
5
(1) Under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
6
428.024, within [four] two years after the transfer was made
7
or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within [one
8
year] six months after the transfer or obligation was or
9
could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;
10
(2) Under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section
11
428.024 o r subsection 1 of section 428.029, within [four]
12
two years after the transfer was made or the obligation was
13
incurred; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1623 2
14
(3) Under subsection 2 of section 428.029, within [one
15
year] si x months after the transfer was made or the
16
obligation was incurred.
1
456.031. 1. The clerk of the probate division of the
2
circuit court sha l l keep a record for each trust so
3
registered, including trust registration statements,
4
petitions and applications, demands for notices or bonds,
5
and of any orders or responses relating thereto by the
6
court, and establish and maintain a system for indexing,
7
filing or recording which is sufficient to enable users of
8
the records to identify and obtain information about such
9
registered trusts. Upon payment of the fees required by law
10
the clerk must iss u e certified copies of any record or paper
11
filed or recorded.
12
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
13
contrar y , upon the filing of any petition, the instrument on
14
which the trust is based, briefs, and the entire court
15
record, including a trust's inventory, statement filed by
16
any fiduciary, annual verified report of a fiduciary, final
17
report of a fiduciary, and all petitions relevant to trust
18
administration and all court orders thereon shall be sealed
19
upon filing and may not be made a part of the public record
20
of the proceeding, but are available to the court, to the
21
trustor, to any fiduciary, to any enforcer, to any
22
beneficiary or the beneficiary's representative, to their
23
attorneys, and to such other interested persons as the court
24
may order upon a showing of need.
1
456.1-103. In sections 456.1-101 to 456.11-1106, the
2
following terms shall mean:
3
(1) "Action", with respect to an act of a trustee,
4
includes a failure to act;

SB 1623 3
5
(2) "Ascertainable standard", a standard relating to
6
an indiv i dual's health, education, support, or maintenance
7
within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or Section
8
[2541(c)(1)] 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
9
(3) "Beneficiary", a person that:
10
(a) Has a present or future beneficial interest in a
11
trust, v e sted or contingent; or
12
(b) In a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a
13
power of appointment over trust property;
14
(4) "Charitable trust", a trust, or portion of a
15
trust, c r eated for a charitable purpose described in
16
subsection 1 of section 456.4-405;
17
(5) "Conservator", a person described in subdivision
18
(3) of s e ction 475.010. This term does not include a
19
conservator ad litem;
20
(6) "Conservator ad litem", a person appointed by the
21
court pu r suant to the provisions of section 475.097;
22
(7) ["Directed trust", any trust, including a split
23
interest trust, in which the trust instrument:
24
(a) Authorizes a trust protector to instruct or direct
25
the trus t ee;
26
(b) Charges a trust protector with any
27
responsi b ilities regarding the trust;
28
(c) Grants the trust protector one or more powers over
29
the trus t ; or
30
(d) Directs one or more powers over the trust to a
31
person, w ho is not serving as a trustee, and is not a
32
settlor or a beneficiary;
33
(8)] "Environmental law", a federal, state, or local
34
law, rule , regulation, or ordinance relating to protection
35
of the environment;

SB 1623 4
36
[(9)] (8) "Financial institution", a non-foreign bank,
37
savings an d lo a n or trust company chartered, regulated and
38
supervised by the Missouri division of finance, the office
39
of the comptroller of the currency, the office of thrift
40
supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, or
41
the Missouri division of credit union supervision. The term
42
"non-foreign bank" shall mean a bank that is not a foreign
43
bank within the meaning of subdivision (1) of section
44
361.005;
45
[(10)] (9) "Guardian", a person described in
46
subdivision (8) of section 475.010. The term does not
47
include a guardian ad litem;
48
[(11)] (10) "Interested persons", include
49
beneficiarie s an d any others having a property right in or
50
claim against a trust estate which may be affected by a
51
judicial proceeding. It also includes fiduciaries and other
52
persons representing interested persons. The meaning as it
53
relates to particular persons may vary f r om time to time and
54
must be determined according to the particular purposes of,
55
and matter involved in, any proceeding;
56
[(12)] (11) "Interests of the beneficiaries", the
57
beneficial i nter e sts provided in the terms of the trust;
58
[(13)] (12) "Internal Revenue Code", the United States
59
Internal Rev enue Code of 1986, as in effect on January 1,
60
2005, or as later amended;
61
[(14)] (13) "Jurisdiction", with respect to a
62
geographic a rea, includes a state or country;
63
[(15)] (14) "Person", an individual, corporation,
64
business tru st, e state, trust, partnership, limited
65
liability company, association, joint venture, government;
66
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public
67
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity;

SB 1623 5
68
[(16)] (15) "Permissible distributee", a beneficiary
69
who is curre ntly eligible to receive distributions of trust
70
income or principal, whether mandatory or discretionary;
71
[(17)] (16) "Power of withdrawal", a presently
72
exercisable powe r of a beneficiary to withdraw assets from
73
the trust without the consent of the trustee or any other
74
person;
75
[(18)] (17) "Principal place of administration", of a
76
trust is the tru s tee's usual place of business where the
77
records pertaining to the trust are kept, or the trustee's
78
residence if the trustee has no such place of business,
79
unless otherwise designated by the terms of the trust as
80
provided in section 456.1-108. In the case of cotrustees,
81
the principal place of adminis t ration is, in the following
82
order of priority:
83
(a) The usual place of business of the corporate
84
trustee i f there is but one corporate cotrustee;
85
(b) The usual place of business or residence of the
86
trustee w ho is a professional fiduciary if there is but one
87
such trustee and no corporate cotrustee; or
88
(c) The usual place of business or residence of any of
89
the cotr u stees;
90
[(19)] (18) "Professional fiduciary", an individual
91
who represen ts h i mself or herself to the public as having
92
specialized training, experience or skills in the
93
administration of trusts;
94
[(20)] (19) "Property", anything that may be the
95
subject of o wner s hip, whether real or personal, legal or
96
equitable, or any interest therein;
97
[(21)] (20) "Qualified beneficiary", a beneficiary
98
who, on the date the beneficiary's qualification is
99
determined:

SB 1623 6
100
(a) Is a permissible distributee;
101
(b) Would be a permissible distributee if the
102
interest s of the permissible distributees described in
103
paragraph (a) of this subdivision terminated on that date; or
104
(c) Would be a permissible distributee if the trust
105
terminat e d on that date;
106
[(22)] (21) "Record", information that is inscribed on
107
a tangible m ediu m or that is stored in an electronic or
108
other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
109
[(23)] (22) "Revocable", as applied to a trust, means
110
that the set tlor has the legal power to revoke the trust
111
without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an
112
adverse interest, regardless of whether the settlor has the
113
mental capacity to do so in fact;
114
[(24)] (23) "Settlor", a person, including a testator,
115
who creates, or c ontributes property to, a trust. If more
116
than one person creates or contributes property to a trust,
117
each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust
118
property attributable to that person's contribution except
119
to the extent another person has the power to revoke or
120
withdraw that portion pursuant to the terms of the trust;
121
[(25)] (24) "Sign", with present intent to
122
authenticate or a dopt a record:
123
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
124
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the
125
record a n electronic sound, symbol, or process;
126
[(26)] (25) "Spendthrift provision", a term of a trust
127
which restra ins e ither the voluntary or involuntary transfer
128
or both the voluntary and involuntary transfer of a
129
beneficiary's interest;
130
[(27)] (26) "State", a state of the United States, the
131
District of Colu m bia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin

SB 1623 7
132
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
133
the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an
134
Indian tribe or band recognized by fed e ral law or formally
135
acknowledged by a state;
136
[(28)] (27) "Terms of a trust", the manifestation of
137
the settlor' s in t ent regarding a trust's provisions as
138
expressed in the trust instrument or as may be established
139
by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial
140
proceeding;
141
[(29)] (28) "Trust instrument", an instrument executed
142
by the settl or t h at contains terms of the trust, including
143
any amendments thereto;
144
[(30) "Trust protector", any person, group of persons,
145
or entity n ot serving as a trustee and not the settlor or a
146
beneficiary, designated in a trust instrument to instruct or
147
direct the trustee or charged in the trust instrument with
148
any responsibilities regarding the trust or expressly
149
granted in the trust instrument one or more powers over the
150
trust. The term trust protector includes, but is not
151
limite d to, persons or entities identified in the trust
152
instrument as trust advisors, trust directors, distribution
153
advisors, or investment advisors;
154
(31)] (29) "Trustee", includes an original,
155
additional , and successor trustee, and a cotrustee.
1
456.4-419. 1. Unless the terms of the trust
2
instrument expr e ssl y provide otherwise, a trustee, other
3
than a settlor, who has discretionary power under the terms
4
of a trust to make a distribution of income or principal,
5
whether or not limited by an ascertainable standard, to or
6
for the benefit of one or more beneficiaries of a trust, the
7
first trust, may instead exercise such discretionary power,
8
independently or with court approval, by distributing all or

SB 1623 8
9
part of the income or principal subject to such
10
discretionary power in favor of a trustee of a second trust,
11
the second trust, created under either the same or different
12
trust instrument in the event that the trustee of the first
13
trust decides that the distribution is necessary or
14
desirable after taking into account the terms and purposes
15
of the first trust, the terms and purposes of the second
16
trust, and the consequences of the distribution. A trustee
17
may exercise the power described in this subsect i on by
18
distributing property from the first trust to one or more
19
second trusts or by modifying the trust instrument for the
20
first trust which, as modified, becomes one or more second
21
trusts.
22
2. With respect to a second trust to which a
23
distrib u tion is made pursuant to subsection 1 of this
24
section:
25
(1) At least one permissible distributee of the first
26
trust sh a ll be a permissible distributee of the second trust
27
immediately after the distribution;
28
(2) If, at the time of the distribution, the settlor
29
of the f i rst trust is living and the first trust is not a
30
grantor trust under Subpart E of Part I of Subchapter J of
31
Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
32
there may not be any permissible distributee of the second
33
trust immediately after the distribution who is not a
34
permissible distributee of the first trust;
35
(3) If, at the time of the distribution, the settlor
36
of the f i rst trust is deceased or if, at the time of the
37
distribution, the first trust is a grantor trust under
38
Subpart E of Part I of Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of the
39
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for reasons other
40
than the trustee having the power granted by this section,

SB 1623 9
41
any beneficiary of the first trust may be included as a
42
permissible distributee of the second trust immediately
43
after the distribution;
44
(4) The second trust may not include any beneficiary
45
who is n o t a beneficiary of the first trust; and
46
(5) The trust instrument for the second trust may
47
retain, m odify, or omit a power of appointment granted in
48
the first trust, and the trust instrument for the second
49
trust may create a power of appointment if the powerholder
50
is a beneficiary of the second trust. Except to the extent
51
provided otherwise in subsection 4 of this section, a power
52
of appointment in the trust instrument for the second trust
53
may be a general or nongeneral power of appointment and the
54
permissible appointees of the power need not be limited to
55
the beneficiaries of the first trust.
56
3. The following provisions apply to a trust that has
57
a benef i ciary with a disability:
58
(1) As used in this subsection, the following terms
59
mean:
60
(a) "Beneficiary with a disability", a beneficiary of
61
a first t rust who the special-needs fiduciary believes may
62
qualify for governmental benefits based on disability,
63
whether or not the beneficiary currently receives those
64
benefits or is an individual who has been adjudicated
65
disabled or adjudicated incapacitated;
66
(b) "Governmental benefits", financial aid or services
67
from a s t ate, federal, or other public agency;
68
(c) "Special-needs fiduciary", with respect to a trust
69
that has a beneficiary with a disability:
70
a. A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor,
71
who has discretionary power under the terms of a trust to
72
make a distribution of income or principal, whether or not

SB 1623 10
73
limited by an ascertainable standard, to or for the benefit
74
of one or more beneficiaries; or
75
b. If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under
76
subpara g raph a. of this paragraph, a trustee or other
77
fiduciary, other than a settlor, who is required to
78
distribute part or all of the income or principal of the
79
first trust to or for the benefit of one or more
80
beneficiaries;
81
(d) "Special-needs trust", a trust the trustee
82
believes would not be considered a resource for purposes of
83
determining whether a beneficiary with a disability is
84
eligible for governmental benefits;
85
(2) A special-needs fiduciary may exercise the
86
authorit y granted by subsection 1 of this section if:
87
(a) A second trust is a special-needs trust that
88
benefits the beneficiary with a disability; and
89
(b) The special-needs fiduciary determines that
90
exercise of the authority pursuant to subsection 1 of this
91
section will further the purposes of the first trust; and
92
(3) The following provisions apply to any exercise of
93
the auth o rity granted by this subsection:
94
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (4)
95
of subse c tion 2 of this section to the contrary, the terms
96
of the second trust may:
97
a. Provide that an interest is held by a pooled trust
98
as defi n ed by Medicaid law for the benefit of the
99
beneficiary with a disability under 42 U.S.C. Section
100
1396p(d)(4)(C); or
101
b. Contain payback provisions complying with
102
reimbur s ement requirements of Medicaid law under 42 U.S.C.
103
Section 1396p(d)(4)(A);

SB 1623 11
104
(b) The provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection 4
105
of this s ection shall not apply to the interests of the
106
beneficiary with a disability; and
107
(c) Except as affected by any change to the interests
108
of the b e neficiary with a disability, the second trust, or
109
if there are two or more second trusts, the second trusts in
110
the aggregate, shall grant each other beneficiary of the
111
first trust beneficial interests in the second trusts which
112
are substantially similar to the beneficiary's beneficial
113
interests in the first trust, unless such other
114
beneficiary's interest is modified in accordance with the
115
provisions of this section other than this subsection.
116
4. The following provisions apply to any exercise of
117
the aut h ority granted by subsection 1 of this section:
118
(1) If the exercise of the authority granted by
119
subsecti o n 1 of this section is limited by an ascertainable
120
standard and the trustee exercising such authority is a
121
permissible distributee of the first trust under such
122
standard, then:
123
(a) The discretionary power under the trust instrument
124
for the s econd trust to distribute income or principal to
125
such trustee as a permissible distributee shall be subject
126
to the same ascertainable standard as, or a more restrictive
127
ascertainable standard than, such standard in the trust
128
instrument for the first trust; and
129
(b) The trust instrument for the second trust shall
130
not:
131
a. Modify a power of appointment granted to such
132
trustee in the first trust; or
133
b. Grant a power of appointment to such trustee that
134
did not exist in the first trust;

SB 1623 12
135
(2) An exercise of the authority granted by subsection
136
1 of thi s section is subject to the following limitations:
137
(a) If the first trust contains property that
138
qualifie d , or would have qualified but for provisions of
139
this section other than this subdivision, for a marital
140
deduction for purposes of the gift or estate tax under the
141
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the trust
142
instrument for the second trust shall not include or omit
143
any term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
144
instrument for the second trust, would have prevented the
145
transfer from qualifying for the deduction, or would have
146
reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same
147
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code under which the
148
transfer qualified;
149
(b) If the first trust contains property that
150
qualifie d , or would have qualified but for provisions of
151
this section other than this subdivision, for a charitable
152
deduction for purposes of the income, gift, or estate tax
153
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the
154
trust instrument for the second trust shall not include or
155
omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
156
instrument for the second trust, would have prevented the
157
transfer from qualifying for the deduction, or would have
158
reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same
159
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code under which the
160
transfer qualified;
161
(c) If the first trust contains property that
162
qualifie d , or would have qualified but for provisions of
163
this section other than this subdivision, for the exclusion
164
from the gift tax described in Section 2503(b) of the
165
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the trust
166
instrument for the second trust shall not include or omit a

SB 1623 13
167
term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
168
instrument for the second trust, would have prevented the
169
transfer from qualifying under Section 2503(b) of the
170
Internal Revenue Code. If the first trust contains property
171
that qualified, or wou l d have qualified but for provisions
172
of this section other than this subdivision, for the
173
exclusion from the gift tax described in Section 2503(b) of
174
the Internal Revenue Code, by application of Section 2503(c)
175
of the Internal Revenue Code, the trust instrument for the
176
second trust shall not include or omit a term that, if
177
included or omitted from the trust instrument for the second
178
trust, would have prevented the transfer from meeting the
179
requirements of Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
180
(d) If the property of the first trust includes shares
181
of stock in an S corporation, as defined in Section 1361 of
182
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the first
183
trust is, or but for provisions of this section other than
184
this subdivision would be, a permitted shareholder under any
185
provision of Section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, the
186
trustee of the first trust may exercise such authority with
187
respect to part or all of the S corporation stock only if
188
the second trust receiving the stock is a permitted
189
shareholder under Section 1361(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue
190
Code. If the property of the first trust includes shares of
191
stock in an S corporation and the first trust is, or but for
192
provisions of this section other than this subdivision would
193
be, a qualified subchapter-S trust within the meaning of
194
Section 1361(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, the trust
195
instrument for the second trust shall not include or omit a
196
term that prevents the second trust from qualifying as a
197
qualified subchapter-S trust; and

SB 1623 14
198
(e) If the first trust contains property that
199
qualifie d , or would have qualified but for provisions of
200
this section other than this subdivision, for a zero
201
inclusion ratio for purpose of the generation-skipping
202
transfer tax under Section 2642(c) of the Internal Revenue
203
Code of 1986, as amended, the trust instrument for the
204
second trust shall not include or omit a term that, if
205
included in or omitted from the first trust, would have
206
prevented the transfer to the first trust from qualifying
207
for a zero inclusion ratio under Section 2642(c) of the
208
Internal Revenue Code;
209
(3) The exercise of such authority does not apply to
210
trust pr o perty subject to a presently exercisable power of
211
withdrawal held by a trust beneficiary to whom, or for the
212
benefit of whom, the trustee has authority to make
213
distributions, unless after the exercise of such authority,
214
such beneficiary's power of withdrawal is unchanged with
215
respect to the trust property; and
216
(4) A spendthrift clause or a provision in the trust
217
instrume n t that prohibits amendment or revocation of the
218
trust shall not preclude the trustee from exercising the
219
authority granted by subsection 1 of this section.
220
5. At least sixty days prior to making a discretionary
221
distrib u tion under subsection 1 of this section, the trustee
222
of the first trust shall notify the permissible distributees
223
of the first trust and the permissible distributees of the
224
second trust of the distribution. A beneficiary may waive
225
the right to the notice required b y this subsection and,
226
with respect to future distributions, may withdraw a waiver
227
previously given.
228
6. In exercising the authority granted by subsection 1
229
of this section, the trustee shall remain subject to all

SB 1623 15
230
fiduciary duties otherwise imposed under the trust
231
instrument and Missouri law.
232
7. This section does not impose on a trustee a duty to
233
exercis e the authority granted by subsection 1 of this
234
section in favor of another trust or to consider exercising
235
such authority in favor of another trust.
236
8. A second trust may have a duration that is the same
237
as or d i fferent from the duration of the first trust.
238
However, to the extent that property of the second tr u st is
239
attributable to property of the first trust, the property of
240
the second trust is subject to any rules governing maximum
241
perpetuity, accumulation, or suspension of the power of
242
alienation which apply to property of the first trust. The
243
perpetuities period and any other time limitation on th e
244
vesting of an interest applicable to the first trust shall
245
apply to property of the second trust as if the second trust
246
had been created on the date the first trust was created.
247
The provisions of this subsection shall not preclude the
248
creation of a general power of appointment in the trust
249
instrument for a second trust as authorized by subdivision
250
(5) of subsection 2 of this section.
251
9. In the event the trust instrument for the second
252
trust i n part does not comply with this section but would
253
otherwise be effective under this section, the exercise of
254
the power is effective and the following rules apply with
255
respect to the principal of the second trust attributable to
256
the exercise of the power:
257
(1) A provision in the trust instrument for the second
258
trust wh i ch is not permitted under this section is void to
259
the extent necessary to comply with this section; and
260
(2) A provision required by this section to be in the
261
trust in s trument for the second trust which is not contained

SB 1623 16
262
in the trust instrument is deemed to be included in the
263
trust instrument to the extent necessary to comply with this
264
section.
265
10. This section is intended to codify and, from and
266
after en a ctment, to provide certain limitations to the
267
common law of this state, and this section applies to any
268
trust governed by the laws of this state, including a trust
269
whose principal place of administration is transferred to
270
this state before or after the enactment of this section.
1
456.5-505. 1. Whether or not the terms of a trust
2
contain a spend t hri f t provision, during the lifetime of the
3
settlor, the property of a revocable trust is subject to
4
claims of the settlor's creditors.
5
2. With respect to an irrevocable trust without a
6
spendth r ift provision, a creditor or assignee of the settlor
7
may reach the maximum amount that can be distributed to or
8
for the settlor's benefit. If a trust has more than one
9
settlor, the amount the creditor or assignee of a particular
10
settlor may reach may not exceed the settlor's interest in
11
the portion of the trust attributable to that settlor's
12
contribution.
13
3. With respect to an irrevocable trust with a
14
spendth r ift provision, a spendthrift provision will prevent
15
the settlor's creditors from satisfying claims from the
16
trust assets except:
17
(1) Where the conveyance of assets to the trust was
18
fraudule n t as to creditors pursuant to the provisions of
19
chapter 428; or
20
(2) To the extent of the settlor's beneficial interest
21
in the t r ust assets, if at the time the trust became
22
irrevocable:

SB 1623 17
23
(a) The settlor was the sole beneficiary of either the
24
income o r principal of the trust or retained the power to
25
amend the trust; or
26
(b) The settlor was one of a class of beneficiaries
27
and reta i ned a right to receive a specific portion of the
28
income or principal of the trust that was determinable
29
solely from the provisions of the trust instrument.
30
4. In the event that a trust meets the requirements
31
set for t h in subsection 3 of this section, a settlor's
32
creditors may not reach the settlor's beneficial interest in
33
that trust, regardless of:
34
(1) Any testamentary power of appointment that is
35
exercisab le by the settlor, by a will or other w ritten
36
instrument, in favor of any appointees other than the
37
settlor, the settlor's estate, the settlor's creditors, or
38
the creditors of the settlor's estate; or
39
(2) The settlor's power to veto distributions from the
40
trust.
41
5. Any trustee who has a duty or power to pay the
42
debts o f a deceased settlor may publish a notice in a
43
newspaper published in the county designated in subdivision
44
(3) of this subsection once a week for four consecutive
45
weeks in substantially the following form:
46
To all persons interested in the
47
estate of _________, decedent. The
48
undersigned _________ is acting as Trustee
49
under a trust the terms of which provide
50
that the debts of the decedent may be paid
51
by the Trustee(s) upon receipt of proper
52
proof thereof. The address of the Trustee
53
is _________.

SB 1623 18
54
All creditors of the decedent are
55
noticed to present their claims to the
56
undersigned within six (6) months from the
57
date of the first publication of this
58
notice or be forever barred.
59
__________________Trustee
60
(1) If such publication is duly made by the trustee,
61
any debt s not presented to the trustee within six months
62
from the date of the first publication of the preceding
63
notice shall be forever barred as against the trustee and
64
the trust property.
65
(2) A trustee shall not be liable to account to the
66
decedent ' s personal representative under the provisions of
67
section 461.300 by reason of any debt barred under the
68
provisions of this subsection.
69
(3) Such publication shall be in a newspaper published
70
in:
71
(a) The county in which the domicile of the settlor at
72
the time of his or her death is situated;
73
(b) If the settlor had no domicile in this state at
74
the time of his or her death, any county wherein trust
75
assets are located; except that, when the major part of the
76
trust assets in this state consist of real estate, the
77
notice shall be published in the county in which the real
78
estate or the major part thereof is located; or
79
(c) If the settlor had no domicile in this state at
80
the time of his or her death and no trust assets are located
81
therein, the county wherein the principal place of
82
administration of the trust is located.
83
(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term
84
"domicil e " means the place in which the settlor voluntarily

SB 1623 19
85
fixed his or her abode, not for a mere special or temporary
86
purpose, but with a present intention of remaining there
87
permanently or for an indefinite term.
88
6. For purposes of this section:
89
(1 ) During the period the power may be exercised, the
90
holder o f a power of withdrawal is treated in the same
91
manner as the settlor of a revocable trust to the extent of
92
the property subject to the power; and
93
(2) Upon the lapse, release, or waiver of the power,
94
the hold e r is treated as the settlor of the trust only to
95
the extent the value of the property affected by the lapse,
96
release, or waiver exceeds the greater of the amount
97
specified in Sections 2041(b)(2), 2514(e) or 2503(b) of the
98
Internal Revenue Code.
99
7. For all purposes of sections 456.5-501 to 456.5-
100
508, th e settlor of any of the following trusts, known as
101
the "first trust" in this subsection, shall not be treated
102
as the settlor of any other trust, known as the "second
103
trust" in this subsection, that is created pursuant to the
104
exercise of a power of appointment over the first trust if
105
the settlor is a beneficiary of the second trust:
106
(1) An irrevocable inter vivos trust for the benefit
107
of the s e ttlor's spouse that qualifies for the marital
108
deduction from the federal gift tax under Section 2523(e) of
109
the Internal Revenue Code;
110
(2) An irrevocable inter vivos trust for the benefit
111
of the s e ttlor's spouse that qualifies for the marital
112
deduction from the federal gift tax under Section 2523(f) of
113
the Internal Revenue Code;
114
(3) An irrevocable inter vivos trust for the benefit
115
of the s e ttlor's spouse, or the settlor's spouse and other
116
beneficiaries, where the settlor's spouse is the beneficiary

SB 1623 20
117
who exercises the power of appointment to create the second
118
trust; and
119
(4) An irrevocable inter vivos trust where any
120
benefici a ry exercises a general power of appointment to
121
create the second trust.
122
8. This section shall not apply to a spendthrift trust
123
describ e d, defined, or established in section 456.014.
124
9. An action by a creditor against a transfer to a
125
Missour i qualified self-settled trust with a spendthrift
126
provision shall be brought within two years from the date
127
the transfer is made or within six months from the date the
128
creditor discovers or reasonably should have discovered the
129
transfer, whichever is later.
1
456.8-808. 1. [While a trust is revocable, the
2
trustee may fol l ow a direction of the settlor that is
3
contrary to the terms of the trust.] As used in this
4
section, the following terms mean:
5
(1) "Custodial account", an account, established by a
6
party wi t h a bank as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 408(n) or
7
with another person approved by the Internal Revenue Service
8
as satisfying the requirements to be a nonbank trustee or a
9
nonbank passive trustee set forth in regulations promulgated
10
by the United States Department of the Treasury under 26
11
U.S.C. Section 408, that is governed by an instrument
12
concerning the establishment or maintenance, or both, of an
13
individual retirement account, qualified retirement plan,
14
Archer medical savings account, health savings account,
15
Coverdell education savings account, or any similar
16
retirement or savings vehicle permitted under the Internal
17
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
18
(2) "Custodial account owner", any party who:
19
(a) Establishes a custodial account;

SB 1623 21
20
(b) Has the power to designate the beneficiaries or
21
appoint t he custodian of the custodial account; or
22
(c) Is the party who possesses the power to direct the
23
investme n t, disposition, or retention of any assets in the
24
custodial account or name an authorized designee to affect
25
the same;
26
(3) "Distribution trust advisor", a fiduciary, given
27
authorit y by the instrument to exercise all or any portions
28
of the powers and discretions set forth in subsection 16 of
29
this section;
30
(4) "Excluded fiduciary", any fiduciary excluded from
31
exercisi n g certain powers under the instrument, which powers
32
may be exercised by the grantor, custodial account owner,
33
trust advisor, trust protector, trust committee, or other
34
persons designated in the instrument;
35
(5) "Family advisor", any person:
36
(a) Whose appointment is provided for in the governing
37
instrume n t or by court order;
38
(b) Who is authorized to consult with or advise a
39
fiduciar y regarding fiduciary or nonfiduciary matters and
40
actions; and
41
(c) Who may also be authorized by the governing
42
instrume n t or court order to otherwise act in a nonfiduciary
43
capacity;
44
(6) "Fiduciary", a trustee or custodian under any
45
instrume n t, an executor, administrator, or personal
46
representative of a decedent's estate, or any other party,
47
including a trust advisor, a trust protector, or a trust
48
committee, who is acting in a fiduciary capacity for any
49
person, trust, or estate;
50
(7) "Investment trust advisor", a fiduciary, given
51
authorit y by the instrument to exercise all or any portions

SB 1623 22
52
of the powers and discretions set forth in subsection 15 of
53
this section;
54
(8) "Tax trust advisor", a fiduciary, given authority
55
by the i n strument to exercise any tax power, including all
56
or any powers and discretions set forth in subsection 18 of
57
this section;
58
(9) "Trust advisor", an investment trust advisor, a
59
distribu t ion trust advisor, a tax trust advisor, or, in the
60
case of a custodial account, a custodial account owner or
61
the owner's designee;
62
(10) "Trust protector", any person whose appointment
63
as protec t or is provided for in the instrument. Such person
64
may not be considered to be acting in a fiducia r y capacity
65
except to the extent the governing instrument provides
66
otherwise. However, a protector shall be considered acting
67
in a fiduci ary capacity to the extent that the person
68
exercises the authority of an investment trust advisor, a
69
distribution trust advisor, or a tax trust advisor.
70
2. A trust instrument may provide for one or more
71
persons , not then serving as a trustee and not the settlor
72
or a beneficiary, to be given any powers, rights,
73
privileges, benefits, immunities, or authorities over the
74
trust that is available to a trustee under the laws of this
75
state or under the trust instrument as expressly granted in
76
the trust instrument. Any such person may be identified and
77
appointed as a trust p rotector or [similar term] trust
78
advisor. Whenever a trust instrument names, appoints,
79
authoriz e s, or otherwise designates a trust protector, the
80
trust shall be deemed a directed trust.
81
3. A trust protector appointed in the trust instrument
82
shall h a ve only the powers granted to the trust protector by
83
the express terms of the trust instrument, and a trust

SB 1623 23
84
protector is only authorized to act within the scope of the
85
authority expressly granted in the trust instrument.
86
Without limiting the authority of the settlor to gra n t
87
powers to a trust protector, the express powers that may be
88
granted and exercised, in the best interests of the trust,
89
in the sole and absolute discretion of the trust protector,
90
and are binding on all other persons include[, but are not
91
limited to,] the following:
92
(1) Remove and appoint a trustee [or a trust protector
93
or name] , a fiduciary provided for in the trust instrument,
94
trust advisor, investment committee member, or distribution
95
committee member or appoint a successor [trustee or] trust
96
protector;
97
(2) Modify or amend the trust instrument to:
98
(a) Achieve favorable tax status or respond to changes
99
in the I n ternal Revenue Code or state law, or the rulings
100
and regulations under such code or law;
101
(b) Take advantage of laws governing restraints on
102
alienati o n, distribution of trust property, or the
103
administration of the trust;
104
(c) Change the terms of any power of appointment
105
granted b y the trust, except a modification or amendment may
106
not grant a beneficial interest to any individual or class
107
of individuals not specifically provided for under the trust
108
instrument;
109
(d) Reflect legal changes that affect trust
110
administ r ation;
111
[(c)] (e) Correct errors or ambiguities that might
112
otherwise requ i re court construction; or
113
[(d)] (f) Correct a drafting error that defeats a
114
grantor's inte n t;

SB 1623 24
115
(3) Increase[,] or decrease[, modify, or restrict] the
116
interest s of the beneficiary or beneficiaries of the trust;
117
(4) Terminate the trust [in favor of the beneficiary
118
or benef i ciaries of the trust];
119
(5) Change the applicable law governing the trust and
120
the trus t situs; [or]
121
(6) [Such] Veto or direct trust distributions;
122
(7) Interpret terms of the trust instrument at the
123
request o f the trustee;
124
(8) Advise the trustee on matters concerning a
125
benefici a ry; or
126
(9) Add to the trust:
127
(a) An individual beneficiary or beneficiaries from a
128
class of individuals identified in the governing instrument;
129
or
130
(b) A charitable beneficiary or beneficiaries from a
131
class of charities identified in the trust instrument;
132
(10) Provide other powers and discretions as are
133
expressly granted to the trust protector in the trust
134
instrument.
135
Any of the powers enumerated in this subsection, as they
136
exist at the time of the signing of a will or trust
137
instrument, may be, by appropriate reference made thereto,
138
incorporated in whole or in part in such will or trust
139
instrument, by a clearly expressed intention of a testator
140
of a will or trustee of a trust instrument.
141
4. [Notwithstanding any provision in the trust
142
instrum e nt to the contrary, a trust protector shall have no
143
power to modify a trust to:
144
(1) Remove a requirement from a trust created to meet
145
the requ i rements of 42 U.S.C. Section 1396p(d)(4) to pay

SB 1623 25
146
back a governmental entity for benefits provided to the
147
permissible beneficiary of the trust at the death of that
148
beneficiary; or
149
(2) Reduce or eliminate an income interest of the
150
income b e neficiary of any of the following types of trusts:
151
(a) A trust for which a marital deduction has been
152
taken fo r federal tax purposes under Section 2056 or 2523 of
153
the Internal Revenue Code or for state tax purposes under
154
any comparable provision of applicable state law, during the
155
life of the settlor's spouse;
156
(b) A charitable remainder trust under Section 664 of
157
the Inte r nal Revenue Code, during the life of the
158
noncharitable beneficiary;
159
(c) A grantor retained annuity trust under Section
160
2702 of t he Internal Revenue Code, during any period in
161
which the settlor is a beneficiary; or
162
(d) A trust for which an election as a qualified Sub-
163
Chapter S Trust under Section 1361(d) of the Internal
164
Revenue Code is currently in place.
165
5. Except to the extent otherwise provided in a trust
166
instrum e nt specifically referring to this subsection, the
167
trust protector shall not exercise a power in a way that
168
would result in a taxable gift for federal gift tax purposes
169
or cause the inclusion of any assets of the trust in the
170
trust protector's gross estate for federal estate tax
171
purposes.
172
6. Except to the extent otherwise provided in the
173
trust i n strument and in subsection 7 of this section, and
174
notwithstanding any provision of sections 456.1-101 to
175
456.11-1106 to the contrary:
176
(1) A trust protector shall act in a fiduciary
177
capacity in carrying out the powers granted to the trust

SB 1623 26
178
protector in the trust instrument, and shall have such
179
duties to the beneficiaries, the settlor, or the trust as
180
set forth in the trust instrument, provided that the trust
181
instrument may provide that the trust protector shall act in
182
a nonfiduciary capacity. A trust protector is not a
183
trustee, and is not liab l e or accountable as a trustee when
184
performing or declining to perform the express powers given
185
to the trust protector in the trust instrument. A trust
186
protector is not liable for the acts or omissio n s of any
187
fiduciary or beneficiary under the trust instrument;
188
(2) A trust protector is exonerated from any and all
189
liabilit y for the trust protector's acts or omissions, or
190
arising from any exercise or nonexercise of the powers
191
expressly conferred on the trust protector in the trust
192
instrument, unless it is established by a preponderance of
193
the evidence that the acts or omissions of the trust
194
protector were done or omitted in breach of the trust
195
protector's duty, in bad faith or with reckless indifference;
196
(3) A trust protector is authorized to exercise the
197
express p owers granted in the trust instrument at any time
198
and from time to time after the trust protector acquires
199
knowledge of their appointment as trust protector and of the
200
powers granted. The trust protector may take any action,
201
judicial or oth e rwise, necessary to carry out the duties
202
given to the trust protector in the trust instrument;
203
(4) A trust protector is entitled to receive, from the
204
assets o f the trust for which the trust protector is acting,
205
reasonable compensation, and reimbursement of the reasonable
206
costs and expenses incurred, in determining whether to carry
207
out, and in carrying out, the express powers given to the
208
trust protector in the trust instrument;

SB 1623 27
209
(5) A trust protector is entitled to receive, from the
210
assets o f the trust for which the trust protector is acting,
211
reimbursement of the reasonable costs and expenses,
212
including attorney's fees, of defending any claim made
213
against the trust protector arising from the acts or
214
omissions of the trust protector acting in that capacity
215
unless it is established by clear and convincing evidence
216
that the trust protector was acting in bad faith or with
217
reckless indifference; and
218
(6) The express powers granted in the trust instrument
219
shall no t be exercised by the trust protector for the trust
220
protector's own personal benefit.
221
7. If a trust protector is granted a power in the
222
trust i n strument to direct, consent to, or disapprove a
223
trustee's actual or proposed investment decision,
224
distribution decision, or other decision of the trustee
225
required to be performed under applicable trust law in
226
carrying out the duties of the trustee in administering the
227
trust, then only with respect to such power, excluding the
228
powers identified in subsection 3 of this section,] The
229
trust protector or trust advisor shall have [the same duties
230
and liabilities] no greater liability to any person than as
231
if serving as a trustee holding or benefitting from the
232
rights, powers, privileges, benefits, immunities, or
233
authority provided or allowed under the trust instrument to
234
such trust advisor or trust protector unless the trust
235
instrument expressly provides otherwise. [In carrying out
236
any written directions given to the trus t ee by the trust
237
protector concerning actual or proposed investment
238
decisions, the trustee shall not be subject to the
239
provisions of sections 469.900 to 469.913. For purposes of
240
this subsection, "investment decisions" me a ns, with respect

SB 1623 28
241
to any investment, decisions to retain, purchase, sell,
242
exchange, tender, or otherwise engage in transactions
243
affecting the ownership of investments or rights therein
244
and, with respect to nonpublicly traded investments, the
245
valuation thereof.
246
8. Any trustee of a directed trust shall not be
247
account a ble under the law or equity for any act or omission
248
of a trust protector and shall stand absolved from liability
249
for executing the decisions or instructions from a trust
250
protector or for monitoring the actions or inactions of a
251
trust protector. A trustee shall take reasonable steps to
252
facilitate the a c tivity of a trust protector in a directed
253
trust. A trustee shall carry out the written directions
254
given t o the trustee by a trust protector acting within the
255
scope of the powers expressly granted to the trust protector
256
in the trust instrument. Except as otherwise provided in
257
the trust instrument, th e trustee shall not be liable for
258
any loss resulting directly or indirectly from any act taken
259
or omitted as a result of the written direction of the trust
260
protector or the failure of the trust protector to provide
261
consent. Except as otherwise provided in the trust
262
instrume n t, the trustee shall have no duty to monitor the
263
conduct of the trust protector, provide advice to or consult
264
with the trust protector, or communicate with or warn or
265
apprise any beneficiary concerning instances in which the
266
trustee would or might have exercised the trustee's own
267
discretion in a manner different from the manner directed by
268
the trust protector. Except as otherwise provided in the
269
trust instrument, an y actions taken by the trustee at the
270
trust protector's direction shall be deemed to be
271
administrative actions taken by the trustee solely to allow
272
the trustee to carry out the instructions of the trust

SB 1623 29
273
protector and shall not be deemed to constitute an act by
274
the trustee to monitor the trust protector or otherwise
275
participate in actions within the scope of the trust
276
protector's authority. Whenever a directed trust reserves
277
to a person or vests i n an advisory or investment committee
278
authority to direct the making or retention of any
279
investment, to the exclusion of the trustee or trustees, the
280
excluded trustee or trustees shall not be liable,
281
individually or as a trustee, for any loss resulting from
282
the making or retention of any investment pursuant to such
283
direction.
284
9. Except to the extent otherwise expressly provided
285
in the t rust instrument, the trust protector shall be
286
entitled to receive information regarding the administration
287
of the trust as follows:
288
(1) Upon the request of the trust protector, unless
289
unreason a ble under the circumstances, the trustee shall
290
promptly provide to the trust protector any and all
291
information related to the trust that may relate to the
292
exercise or nonexercise of a power expressly granted to the
293
trust protector in the trust instrument. The trustee has no
294
obligation to provide any information to the trust protector
295
except to the extent a trust protector requests information
296
under this section;
297
(2) The request of the trust protector for information
298
under th i s section shall be with respect to a single trust
299
that is sufficiently identified to enable the trustee to
300
locate the records of the trust; and
301
(3) If the trustee is bound by any confidentiality
302
restrict i ons with respect to an asset of a trust, a trust
303
protector who requests information under this section about
304
such asset shall agree to be bound by the confidentiality

SB 1623 30
305
restrictions that bind the trustee before receiving such
306
information from the trustee.
307
10. A trust protector may resign by giving thirty
308
days' wr i tten notice to the trustee and any successor trust
309
protector. A successor trust protector, if any, shall have
310
all the po w ers expressly granted in the trust instrument to
311
the resigning trust protector unless such powers are
312
expressly modified for the successor trust protector.
313
11.] 5. A trust protector or trust advisor, by
314
accepting ap p ointment to serve as a trust protector or trust
315
advisor, of a trust having its principal place of
316
administration in this state submits personally to the
317
jurisdiction of the courts of this state during any period
318
that the principal place of administration of the trust is
319
located in this state and the trust protector is serving in
320
such capacity, regardless of whether the investment advisory
321
agreements or other related agreements provide otherwise.
322
The trust instrument may also provide that a trust protect or
323
or trust advisor is subject to the personal jurisdiction of
324
the courts of this state as a condition of appointment. The
325
trust protector or trust advisor may be made a party to any
326
action or proceeding if issues relate to a decision or
327
action of the trust protector or trust advisor.
328
6. Except as otherwise provided in the trust
329
instrum e nt, an excluded fiduciary shall not be liable,
330
either individually or as a fiduciary, for any loss
331
resulting from:
332
(1) Any act taken or omitted as a result of the
333
written d irection of the trust protector or trust advisor
334
appointed under the instrument, including any loss from the
335
trust advisor breaching fiduciary responsibilities or
336
acting beyond the trust advisor's scope of authority;

SB 1623 31
337
(2) A failure to take any action proposed by an
338
excluded fiduciary, which requires prior authorization of
339
the trust advisor, if that excluded fiduciary timely sought
340
but failed to obtain the authorization;
341
(3) Any action or inaction, except for gross
342
negligen c e or willful misconduct, when an excluded fiduciary
343
is required, pursuant to the trust instrument or any other
344
reason, to assume the role of trust protector or trust
345
advisor;
346
(4) Reliance upon any trust advisor for valuation of
347
trust as s ets;
348
(5) Any tax filing made or tax position taken based on
349
the reco m mendations or instructions received from the tax
350
trust advisor or from a tax preparer or professional used by
351
the excluded fiduciary at the direction of the grantor, the
352
tax trust advisor, or another trust fiduciary.
353
7. Any excluded fiduciary shall be relieved from any:
354
(1 ) Obligation to:
355
(a) Independently value trust assets;
356
(b) Review or evaluate any direction from a
357
distribu t ion trust advisor;
358
(c) Perform investment or suitability reviews,
359
inquirie s , or investigations; or
360
(d) Make recommendations or evaluations with respect
361
to any i n vestments to the extent the trust advisor had
362
authority to direct the acquisition, disposition, or
363
retention of the investment; and
364
(2) Duty to communicate with or warn or apprise any
365
benefici a ry or third-party concerning instances in which the
366
excluded fiduciary would or might have exercised the
367
excluded fiduciary's own discretion in a manner different

SB 1623 32
368
from the manner directed by the trust advisor or trust
369
protector.
370
8. (1) If the excluded fiduciary offers such
371
communi c atio n to the trust advisor, trust protector, or any
372
investment person selected by the investment trust advisor,
373
such action does not constitute an undertaking by the
374
excluded fiduciary to monitor or otherwise participate in
375
actions within the scope of the advisor's authority or to
376
constitute any duty to do so.
377
(2) Absent contrary provisions in the trust
378
instrume n t, the actions of the excluded fiduciary, including
379
any communications with the trust advisor and others and
380
carrying out, recording, and reporting actions taken at the
381
trust advisor's direction, pertaining to matters within the
382
scope of authority of the trust advisor or trust protector
383
constitute administrative actions taken by the excluded
384
fiduciary solely to allow the excluded fiduciary to perform
385
those duties assigned to the excluded fiduciary under the
386
governing instrument, and such administrative actions do not
387
constitute an undertaking by the excluded fiduciary to
388
monitor, participate, or otherwise take any fiduciary
389
responsibility for actions within the scope of authority of
390
the trust protector or trust advisor.
391
9. Nothing in subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of this
392
section imposes an obligation or liability with respect to a
393
custodian of a custodial account.
394
10. In an action against an excluded fiduciary
395
pursuant to the provisions of this section, the burden to
396
prove the matter by clear and convincing evidence is on the
397
person seeking to hold the excluded fiduciary liable.

SB 1623 33
398
11. An excluded fiduciary may continue to follow the
399
directio n of the trust advisor upon the incapacity or death
400
of the grantor if the instrument so allows.
401
12. If one or more trust advisors and tax trust
402
advisors are given authority by the terms of a trust
403
instrument to direct, consent to, or disapprove a
404
fiduciary's investment, distribution, or tax decisions, or
405
proposed investment, distribution, or tax decisions, such
406
trust advisors and tax trust advisors are considered to be
407
fiduciaries when exercising such authority.
408
13. (1) For investment decisions, so long as there is
409
at least one f iduciary exercising the authority of the
410
investment trust advisor pursuant to subsection 15 of this
411
section for the investment, except in the case of gross
412
negligence or willful misconduct by the fiduciary investment
413
advisor in the selection or monitoring of the nonfiduciary
414
trust advisors, the trust instrument may provide that such
415
other trust advisors acting pursuant to this section are not
416
acting in a fiduciary capacity.
417
(2) For distribution decisions, so long as there is at
418
least on e fiduciary exercising the authority of the
419
distribution trust advisor pursuant to subsection 16 of this
420
section for the distribution, except in the case of gross
421
negligence or willful misconduct by the fiduciary
422
distribution advisor in the selection or monitoring of the
423
nonfiduciary trust advisors, the trust instrument may
424
provide that the other trust advisors acting pursuant to
425
this section are not acting in a fiduciary capacity.
426
(3) For tax decisions, so long as there is at least
427
one fidu c iary exercising the authority of the tax trust
428
advisor pursuant to subsection 18 of this section for the
429
tax decision, except in the case of gross negligence or

SB 1623 34
430
willful misconduct by the fiduciary tax trust advisor in the
431
selection or monitoring of the nonfiduciary tax trust
432
advisors, the trust instrument may provide that such other
433
tax trust advisors acting pursuant to this section are not
434
acting in a fiduciary capacity.
435
14. A trust instrument governed by the laws of this
436
state ma y provide for a person to act as an investment trust
437
advisor, a distribution trust advisor, or a tax trust
438
advisor, respectively, with regard to investment decisions,
439
distribution decisions, or tax decisions, respectively.
440
Unless otherwise provided or restricted by the terms of the
441
trust instrument, any person may simultaneously serve as a
442
trust advisor and a trust protector.
443
15. The powers and discretions of an investment trust
444
advisor s hall be as provided in the trust instrument and may
445
be exercised in the best interests of the trust, in the sole
446
and absolute discretion of the investment trust advisor, and
447
are binding on any other person and any other interested
448
party, fiduciary, and excluded fiduciary. In addition to
449
the powers and discretions granted to the investment trust
450
advisor in the trust instrument, the investment trust
451
advisor may also exercise any of the following powers and
452
discretions to the extent such exercise is not prohibited
453
under the terms of the trust instrument:
454
(1) Direct the trustee with respect to the retention,
455
purchase , sale, exchange, tender, or other transaction
456
affecting the ownership thereof or rights therein of trust
457
investments. These powers include the pledge or encumbrance
458
of trust pro p erty, lending of trust assets, either secured
459
or unsecured, at terms defined by the investment trust
460
advisor to any party including beneficiaries of the trust

SB 1623 35
461
and the investment and reinvestment of principal and income
462
of the trust;
463
(2) Vote proxies for securities held in trust;
464
(3) Select one or more investment advisers, managers,
465
or couns e lors, including the trustee, and delegate to them
466
any of its powers;
467
(4) Direct the trustee with respect to any additional
468
powers a n d discretions over investment and management of
469
trust assets provided in the trust instrument;
470
(5) Direct the trustee as to the value of nonpublicly
471
traded t r ust investments; and
472
(6) Direct the trustee as to any investment or
473
manageme n t power referenced in this chapter.
474
16. The powers and discretions of a distribution trust
475
advisor o ver any discretionary distributions of income or
476
principal, including distributions pursuant to an
477
ascertainable standard or other criteria and appointments
478
pursuant to section 456.4-419, shall be provided in the
479
trust instrument and may be exercised or not exercised, in
480
the best interests of the trust, in the sole and absolute
481
discretion of the distribution trust advisor, and are
482
binding on any other person and any other interested party,
483
fiduciary, and excluded fiduciary. Unless the terms of the
484
trust instrument provide otherwise , then, in addition to the
485
powers and discretions granted to the distribution trust
486
advisor in the trust instrument, the distribution trust
487
advisor shall direct the trustee with regard to all
488
discretionary distributions to beneficiaries, may direct
489
appointments pursuant to section 456.4-419.
490
17. (1) The powers and discretions of a family
491
advisor a re a s provided in the trust instrument or by court
492
order and may be exercised, in the best interests of the

SB 1623 36
493
trust, and in the sole and absolute discretion of the family
494
advisor. The powers and discretions shall only include the
495
followin g :
496
(a) Remove and appoint a trustee, a fiduciary provided
497
for in t h e governing trust instrument, trust advisor,
498
investment committee member, or distribution committee
499
member;
500
(b) Appoint a trust protector, or a family advisor;
501
(c) Advise the trustee on matters concerning any
502
benefici a ry; receive trust accountings, investment reports,
503
and other information from the trustee or to which a
504
beneficiary is entitled; attend meetings whether in person
505
or by any other means with the trustee, investment trust
506
advisors, distribution trust advisors, or other advisors
507
whether in person or by any means, electronic or otherwise;
508
and to consult with a fiduciary regarding both fiduciary and
509
nonfiduciary matters or actions, all without any power or
510
discretion to take any action as a fiduciary; or
511
(d) Provide direction regarding notification of
512
qualifie d beneficiaries under this chapter.
513
(2) A family advisor is not required to exercise any
514
powers o r discretions under any circumstances. Every action
515
or inaction by a family advisor is a nonfiduci a ry action or
516
inaction and a family advisor is absolutely excluded from
517
liability to any other person for an action or inaction as a
518
family advisor. A court may review a family advisor's
519
exercise of the powers described in paragraphs (a), (b), and
520
(d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection only if the family
521
advisor acts dishonestly or with an improper motive but may
522
not review a family advisor's failure to exercise any
523
powers. A reasonableness standard may not be applied to any
524
action o r inaction of a family advisor. Except as provided

SB 1623 37
525
in this subdivision, a court has no jurisdiction to review a
526
family advisor's action or inaction.
527
(3) A family advisor is entitled to compensation as
528
provided in the trust instrument. If the trust instrument
529
does not provide for or establish compensation, a family
530
advisor is entitled to reasonable compensation for the
531
exercise of the powers and discretions granted to the family
532
advisor pursuant to this chapter.
533
18. The powers and discretions of a tax trust advisor
534
shall be as provided in the trust instrument and may be
535
exercised, in the best interests of the trust, in the sole
536
and absolute discretion of the tax trust advisor, and are
537
binding on any other person and any other interested party,
538
fiduciary, and excluded fiduciary. In addition to the
539
powers and discretions granted to t he tax trust advisor in
540
the trust instrument, the tax trust advisor may also
541
exercise any of the following powers and discretions to the
542
extent the exercise is not prohibited under the terms of
543
such instrument:
544
(1) Direct the trustee with respect to tax matters
545
related t o the trust, including tax elections, tax returns
546
to be filed, positions to be taken on tax returns, tax
547
payments to be made, and the anticipated tax impact to the
548
trust or a beneficiary of any transaction involving the
549
trust, including:
550
(a) The retention, purchase, sale, exchange, or tender
551
of any a s set of the trust;
552
(b) Any contribution to or distribution from:
553
a. T he trust; or
554
b. An entity owned by the trust;
555
(2 ) Direct the trustee:

SB 1623 38
556
(a) To rely on any tax information received from the
557
settlor, the settlor's agents, a tax trust advisor, or other
558
individuals regarding matters that have tax implications to
559
the trust or trust beneficiaries;
560
(b) To sign and file tax returns;
561
(c) With respect to any additional powers and
562
discreti o ns over tax-related matters provided in the
563
governing instrument; or
564
(d) As to any tax-related powers referenced in this
565
chapter; and
566
(3) Select one or more tax advisors to prepare tax
567
returns o r other related filings.
